Utah statutes.
59-2-303.   General duties of county assessor.

(1)  Prior to May 22 each year, the county assessor shall ascertain the names of the owners of all property which is subject to taxation by the county, and shall assess the property to the owner, claimant of record, or occupant in possession or control at 12 o'clock midnight of January 1 in the tax year, unless a subsequent conveyance of ownership of the real property was recorded in the office of the county recorder more than 14 calendar days before the date of mailing of the tax notice.  In that case, any tax notice may be mailed, and the tax assessed, to the new owner.  No mistake in the name or address of the owner or supposed owner of property renders the assessment invalid.

(2)  A county assessor shall become fully acquainted with all property in his county, as provided in Section 59-2-301.

